Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2719
Judgments; notice; to whom sent.

Within three days after entry of any judgment, the clerk of the county court shall send notice of the judgment by first-class United States mail to each party's attorney or attorneys of record or, if none, to an individual defendant at his or her usual place of residence, if known, and to a defendant not an individual to any proper recipient of summons for that party as designated by law.

Laws 1976, LB 425, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-585.01;

Laws 1999, LB 43, § 14.